Massachusetts, session 194th, H3094.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 40Y the following 
chapter:- 
Chapter 40Z. RURAL HOUSING DEVELOPMENT INCENTIVE PROGRAM 
Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the context clearly 
requires otherwise, have the following meanings: 
''Certified rural housing development project'', the substantial rehabilitation of a rural 
housing development project that has been approved by the department for participation in the 
rural housing development incentive program. 

of 8 9  “Department”, the department of housing and community development as established by 
chapter 23B. 
''Rural housing development project'', a multi-unit residential rehabilitation project that is 
located in a rural area and once substantially rehabilitated, shall contain at least 80 per cent 
market rate residential units. 
''Qualified project expenditure'', an expenditure directly related to substantial 
rehabilitation of a rural housing development project, including the cost of site assessment and 
remediation of hazardous materials, but excluding the purchase of the property, provided, 
however, that: (i) the department has certified that the proposed project meets the definition of 
rural housing development project; (ii) prior to construction, the department has certified that all 
or a portion of the project costs are for substantial rehabilitation; and (iii) after the project has 
been completed, the department has certified that the project has been completed in compliance 
with this chapter and the requirements and conditions of any prior certifications. 
“Rural area”, an area with a low concentration of residential housing as determined by 
the department. 
''Substantial rehabilitation'' and ''substantially rehabilitated'', the redevelopment, repair 
and renovation of a property, including site assessment and remediation of hazardous materials, 
but, excluding the purchase of the property, as determined by the department of housing and 
community development. 
Section 2. The department may from time to time designate 1 or more municipalities as a 
rural area and take any and all actions necessary or appropriate to such a designation, upon 
receipt of a municipal application requesting such designation and representing in its application 

of 8 31 that the municipality, based on its own independent investigation, has determined that the area 
proposed for designation has a low concentration of residential housing and has a need for multi-
unit residential properties. The application shall include a plan that shall include a description of 
the activities, public and private, contemplated for such area as of the date of the adoption of the 
designation, including information as the department may require in written guidelines. 
Section 3. (a) A project may be eligible to be a certified rural housing development 
project under this chapter if the project: 
(i) contains 2 or more residential units; 
(ii) is located in a designated or proposed rural area as determined by the department; 
(iii) contains at least 80 per cent market rate units upon completion of the substantial 
rehabilitation, to be sold or leased; and 
(iv) involves the substantial rehabilitation of an existing property. 
(b) The department may from time to time certify 1 or more rural housing development 
projects, located in rural areas designated pursuant to section 2, as certified rural housing 
development projects under this section and take any and all actions necessary or appropriate to 
such a designation, upon compliance with the following: 
(i) receipt of a project proposal for such a designation requesting such designation from 
the municipality, submitted in a timely manner, in such form and with such information as the 
department prescribes, supported by independently verifiable information and signed under the 
penalties of perjury by a person authorized to bind the sponsors; 

of 8 51  (ii) receipt of an agreement executed by the municipality that is approved by the 
department that the project as described in the proposal and all documentation submitted with the 
proposal: 
(A) is consistent with and can reasonably be expected to benefit significantly from the 
municipality's plans relative to the project; 
(B) together with all other projects previously certified and located in the same project 
rural area, shall not overburden the municipality's supporting resources; and 
(C) together with the municipal resources committed to the project, shall, if certified, 
have a reasonable chance of increasing residential growth, diversity of housing supply, 
supporting economic development and promoting neighborhood stabilization in the designated 
rural area as advanced in the proposal; and 
(iii) receipt with such written approval by the municipality of a request for a designation 
of the project as a certified rural housing development project for a specified number of years, 
which shall be not less than 5 years and not more than 20 years. 
(c) The department shall evaluate and either grant or deny any project proposal not later 
than 90 days from the date of its receipt of a complete project proposal and failure to do so by the 
department shall result in approval of such project for a term of 20 years. Approval of a project 
due to the department's failure to act within 90 days shall not constitute approval by the 
department of any tax incentives provided under chapter 62. 
(d) The department may impose a fee for the processing of applications for the 
certification of any project under this section. 

of 8 72  (e) The certification of a project may be revoked by the department if: (i)(A) the 
municipality that approved the project proposal files a petition that satisfies the authorization 
requirements for a municipal application or the petition of the director of the department; and (B) 
the department determines, after an independent investigation, that representations made by the 
sponsors in its project proposal are materially different from the conduct of the sponsors 
subsequent to the certification and such difference is found to frustrate the public purposes that 
the certification was intended to advance; or (ii) the project no longer meets the criteria in this 
section. Upon revocation, the commonwealth and the municipality may bring a cause of action 
against the sponsors for the value of any economic benefit received by the sponsors prior to or 
subsequent to such revocation. Under this section, revocation shall take effect on the first day of 
the tax year in which the department determines that a material variance commenced. The 
commissioner of revenue may, as of the effective date of the revocation, disallow any credits, 
exemptions or other tax benefits allowed by the original certification under this section. The 
commissioner shall issue regulations to recapture the value of any credits, exemptions or other 
tax benefits allowed by the certification under this section. 
(f) Annually, on or before the first Wednesday in December, the department shall file a 
report detailing its findings of the review of all certified housing development projects that it 
evaluated in the prior fiscal year to the commissioner of revenue, to the joint committee on 
revenue and the joint committee on housing and community development. The report shall 
include, but not be limited to: (i) a list of municipalities with approved rural areas; (ii) a list of 
rural housing development projects that have received certification; (iii) information about each 
certified rural housing development project, including the site address, project sponsor, range of 
rents of the residential units, type of residential units, number of each type of residential unit, 

of 8 95 number of affordable rental units for persons whose income is not more than 60 per cent of the 
area median income and the number of affordable owner-occupied units for persons whose 
income is not more than 80 per cent of the area median income; and (iv) the total amount of 
qualified project expenditures for which a tax credit was issued or reserved for each rural 
housing development project, the year the credit was issued and the completion or estimated 
100 completion year of the housing development project. 
101  SECTION 2. Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding 
102 the following subsection:- 
103  (dd)(1) A credit shall be allowed against the tax liability imposed by this chapter, to the 
104 extent awarded by the department of housing and community development as established by 
105 chapter 23B, for a certified rural housing redevelopment project, as defined in chapter 40Z, in an 
106  amount up to 25 per cent of the cost of qualified project expenditures of the market rate 
107 residential units within the certified rural housing development project, as those terms are 
108 defined in said chapter 40Z. The credit under this subsection shall be allowed for the taxable year 
109 in which the department gives the commissioner written notification of completion of the 
110 certified rural housing redevelopment project. 
111  (2) Taxpayers eligible for the this credit may, with prior notice to and under regulations 
112 adopted by the commissioner, transfer the credits, in whole or in part, to any individual or entity, 
113 and the transferee shall be entitled to apply the credits against the tax with the same effect as if 
114 the transferee had incurred the qualified project expenditures itself. If the sponsor of the certified 
115 rural housing development project is a partnership or a limited liability company taxed as a 
116 partnership, the credit, if transferred must be transferred by the partnership or the limited liability 

of 8 117 company. If the credits allowed to a partnership, a limited liability company taxed as a 
118 partnership or multiple owners of property are not transferred they shall be passed through to the 
119 persons designated as partners, members or owners, respectively, pro rata or pursuant to an 
120 executed agreement among the persons designated as partners, members or owners documenting 
121 an alternative distribution method without regard to their sharing of other tax or economic 
122 attributes of the entity. Credits passed through to individual partners and members are not 
123 transferable. 
124  (3) If the credit allowable for any taxable year exceeds the taxpayer's tax liability for that 
125 tax year, the taxpayer may carry forward and apply in any subsequent taxable year, the portion, 
126 as reduced from year to year, of those credits which exceed the tax for the taxable year; 
127 provided, however, that in no event shall the taxpayer apply the credit to the tax for any taxable 
128 year beginning more than 10 years after the taxable year in which department gives the 
129 commissioner written notification of completion of the rural housing redevelopment project. If 
130 the credit is transferred by the taxpayer, the carry over provisions applicable to the transferee 
131 apply. 
132  (4) A transferee shall use the credit in the year it is transferred. If the credit allowable for 
133 any taxable year exceeds the transferee's tax liability for that tax year, the transferee may carry 
134 forward and apply in any subsequent taxable year, the portion, as reduced from year to year, of 
135 those credits which exceed the tax for the taxable year; provided, however, that in no event shall 
136 the transferee apply the credit to the tax for any taxable year beginning more than 10 years after 
137 the taxable year in which the department gives the commissioner written notification of 
138 completion of the certified rural housing development project. 

of 8 139  (5) For any rural housing redevelopment project, qualified project expenditures 
140 applicable to this credit shall be treated for purposes of this subsection as made on the date that 
141 the department gives the commissioner written notification of completion of the rural housing 
142 redevelopment project. 
143  (6) The total amount of credits that may be authorized by the department in a calendar 
144 year pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed $10,000,000 and shall include: (i) credits 
145 granted during the year pursuant to this subsection; and (ii) carry forwards of credits from prior 
146 years pursuant to this subsection, to the extent that such credit carry forwards are estimated by 
147 the 
148  commissioner to offset tax liabilities during the year. Any portion of the $10,000,000 
149 annual cap not awarded by the department in a calendar year shall not be applied to awards in a 
150 subsequent year. The department shall provide the commissioner with any documentation that 
151 the commissioner deems necessary to confirm compliance with the annual cap and the 
152 commissioner shall provide a report confirming compliance with the annual cap to the secretary 
153 of administration and finance and the secretary of housing and economic development. 
154  (7) The commissioner, in consultation with the department, shall prescribe regulations 
155 necessary to carry out this subsection.